Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Scenic Byways and Highways

177.571.
Purpose of KRS 177.571 to 177.576.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares the purpose of KRS

177.571

to

177.576

to be the appropriate recognition and preservation of the scenic qualities of many of Kentucky’s roadways. Therefore, the General Assembly is creating a state system of scenic byways and scenic highways to preserve and present scenic byways and scenic highways for vehicular, bicycle, and pedestrian travel in an unhurried and leisurely environment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 566, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

177.572.
Definitions for KRS 177.571 to 177.576.

As used in KRS

177.571

to

177.576

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Advertising device” means as defined in KRS

177.830

;

“Archaeological quality” means those characteristics of the area surrounding a scenic byway or a scenic highway that are physical evidence of historic or prehistoric human life or activity and that are visible and capable of being inventoried and interpreted. The archaeological interest, as identified through ruins, artifacts, structural remains, or other physical evidence shall have scientific significance that educates the viewer and causes the viewer to appreciate the past;

“Cultural quality” means evidence or expressions of the customs or traditions of a distinct group of people. Cultural features shall include, but not be limited to, crafts, music, dance, rituals, festivals, speech, food, special events, and vernacular architecture, as currently practiced. The cultural qualities of the area surrounding a scenic byway or scenic highway may highlight one (1) or more significant communities or ethnic traditions;

“Historic quality” means legacies of the past that are distinctly associated with the physical elements of the landscape, whether natural or manmade, and that are of historic significance, educate the viewer, and cause the viewer to appreciate the past. The historic qualities reflect the actions of people and may include buildings, settlement patterns, or other examples of human activity. Historic qualities may be inventoried, mapped, and interpreted, and they possess integrity of location, design, setting, material, workmanship, feeling, and association;

“Intrinsic quality” means one (1) or more of the following:

Archaeological quality;

Cultural quality;

Historic quality;

Natural quality;

Recreational quality; or

Scenic quality;

“Natural quality” means those features in the visual environment that are in a relatively undisturbed state. These features shall predate the arrival of human populations and may include geological formations, fossils, landforms, water bodies, vegetation, and wildlife. If there is evidence of human activity, the natural features must reveal minimal disturbances;

“Outdoor advertising device” means an advertising device that is not located on the premises of the entity being advertised;

“Recreational quality” means outdoor recreational activities directly associated with and dependent upon the natural and cultural elements of the scenic byway or scenic highway’s landscape. The recreational activities shall provide opportunities for active and passive recreational experiences including, but not limited to, downhill skiing, rafting, boating, fishing, hiking, and simple roadway driving. The recreational activities may be seasonal, but the quality and importance of the activities as seasonal operations shall be well recognized;

“Scenic byway” means a highway maintained by a local government that has roadsides or view sheds of aesthetic, cultural, historical, or archaeological value worthy of preservation, restoration, protection, or enhancement;

“Scenic highway” means a state-maintained highway that has roadsides or view sheds of aesthetic, cultural, historical, or archaeological value worthy of preservation, restoration, protection, or enhancement; and

“Scenic quality” means the heightened visual experience derived from the view of the natural and manmade elements of the scenic byway or scenic highway. The characteristics of the landscape are strikingly distinct and offer a pleasing and memorable visual experience. All elements of the landscape, including landform, water, vegetation, and manmade development, must contribute in harmony to the quality of the scenic byway’s or scenic highway’s visual environment and share in its intrinsic qualities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 566, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

177.573.
Administrative regulations for designation, nomination, review and removal of scenic designation of byway or highway.

The Transportation Cabinet, in coordination with the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet and the Kentucky Heritage Council, shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to establish:

Specific criteria for a road to be designated a scenic byway or a scenic highway;

A process for nominating and review of a road as a scenic byway or scenic highway;

A process for designating a road as a scenic byway or scenic highway; and

A process to remove the scenic designation from a byway or highway if the intrinsic qualities of the road change or if the community affected by the road requests the scenic designation to be removed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 566, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 95, § 43, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 57, effective June 25, 2009.

177.574.
Criteria for designation.

A road may be designated a scenic byway or scenic highway if it has a minimum of one (1) intrinsic quality as defined in KRS

177.571

; a limit on existing visual intrusions that significantly impact the road; and a local support group that has requested scenic designation for the road and that is committed to maintaining the intrinsic qualities of the area surrounding the road.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 566, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

177.575.
Maintenance by cabinet — Identification signs.

The Transportation Cabinet shall attempt to maintain the character of a state-maintained road that has been designated a scenic highway.

The Transportation Cabinet shall erect and maintain appropriate scenic highway identification signs on each road designated a scenic byway or scenic highway.

The Transportation Cabinet shall conduct necessary routine maintenance and care of a state-maintained road designated as a scenic highway.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 566, § 5, effective July 15, 1998.

177.576.
Adjacent outdoor advertising devices — Existing devices exempted.

The cabinet shall prohibit the erection of an outdoor advertising device adjacent to or visible from a scenic highway on which outdoor advertising devices as defined in KRS

177.572

are regulated under KRS

177.830

to

177.890

.

The status of an outdoor advertising device shall not be changed by a highway being designated as scenic if the outdoor advertising device was legal or designated as nonconforming on the date the highway was designated as scenic.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 566, § 6, effective July 15, 1998.